Virginia statutes. Title 30. General Assembly.
Chapter 31. Commission on Electric Utility Regulation.

[Expires July 1, 2024]

§ 30-201.
(Expires July 1, 2024) Commission on Electric Utility Restructuring continued as Commission on Electric Utility Regulation; purpose.

The Commission on Electric Utility Restructuring established pursuant to Chapter 885 of the Acts of Assembly of 2003, is continued, effective July 1, 2008, as the Commission on Electric Utility Regulation (the Commission) within the legislative branch of state government. The purpose of the Commission is to monitor the State Corporation Commission’s implementation of the Virginia Electric Utility Regulation Act (§ 56-576 et seq.).

History.

2003, c. 885; 2008, c. 883.

Cross references.

For July 1, 2024, sunset of this chapter, see § 30-209.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 1000 substituted ‘Rules‘ for ‘Privileges and Elections‘ in the first paragraph.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 883 rewrote the section.

§ 30-202.
(Expires July 1, 2024) Membership; terms.

The Commission shall consist of 10 legislative members. Members shall be appointed as follows: four members of the Senate to be appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules and six members of the House of Delegates to be appointed by the Speaker of the House of Delegates in accordance with the principles of proportional representation contained in the Rules of the House of Delegates.

Members of the Commission shall serve terms coincident with their terms of office. All members may be reappointed. Appointments to fill vacancies, other than by expiration of a term, shall be made for the unexpired terms. Vacancies shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointments.

The Commission shall elect a chairman and vice-chairman from among its membership. The chairman of the Commission shall be authorized to designate one or more members of the Commission to observe and participate in the discussions of any work group convened by the State Corporation Commission in furtherance of its duties under the Virginia Electric Utility Regulation Act (§ 56-576 et seq.) and this chapter. Members participating in such discussions shall be entitled to compensation and reimbursement provided in § 30-204, if approved by the Joint Rules Committee or its Budget Oversight Subcommittee.

History.

2003, c. 885; 2004, c. 1000; 2008, c. 883.

Cross references.

For July 1, 2024, sunset of this chapter, see § 30-209.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 1000 substituted ‘Rules‘ for ‘Privileges and Elections‘ in the first paragraph.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 883 substituted ‘Virginia Electric Utility Regulation Act‘ for ‘Virginia Electric Restructuring Act‘ in the last paragraph.

§ 30-203.
(Expires July 1, 2024) Quorum; meetings; voting on recommendations.

A majority of the members shall constitute a quorum. The meetings of the Commission shall be held at the call of the chairman or whenever the majority of the
members so request.

No recommendation of the Commission shall be adopted if a majority of the Senate members or a majority of the House members appointed to the Commission (i) vote against the recommendation and (ii) vote for the recommendation to fail notwithstanding the majority vote of the Commission.

History.

2003, c. 885; 2004, c. 1000.

Cross references.

For July 1, 2024, sunset of this chapter, see § 30-209.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 1000 deleted ‘voting‘ preceding ‘members‘ twice in the first paragraph and rewrote the second paragraph.

§ 30-204.
(Expires July 1, 2024) Compensation; expenses.

Members of the Commission shall receive such compensation as provided in § 30-19.12 and shall be reimbursed for all reasonable and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties as provided in §§

2.2-2813

and

2.2-2825

. However, all such compensation and expenses shall be paid from existing appropriations to the Commission or, if unfunded, shall be approved by the Joint Rules Committee.

History.

2003, c. 885.

Cross references.

For July 1, 2024, sunset of this chapter, see § 30-209.

§ 30-205.
(Expires July 1, 2024) Powers and duties of the Commission.

The Commission shall have the following powers and duties:

Monitor the work of the State Corporation Commission in implementing Chapter 23 (§ 56-576 et seq.) of Title 56, receiving such reports as the Commission may be required to make pursuant thereto, including reviews, analyses, and impact on consumers of electric utility regulation in other states;

Examine generation, transmission and distribution systems reliability concerns;

Establish one or more subcommittees, composed of its membership, persons with expertise in the matters under consideration by the Commission, or both, to meet at the direction of the chairman of the Commission, for any purpose within the scope of the duties prescribed to the Commission by this section, provided that such persons who are not members of the Commission shall serve without compensation but shall be entitled to be reimbursed from funds appropriated or otherwise available to the Commission for reasonable and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties; and

Report annually to the General Assembly and the Governor with such recommendations as may be appropriate for legislative and administrative consideration in order to maintain reliable service in the Commonwealth while preserving the Commonwealth’s position as a low-cost electricity market.

History.

2003, c. 885; 2006, c. 812; 2008, c. 883.

Cross references.

For July 1, 2024, sunset of this chapter, see § 30-209.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 812 added subdivision 5; redesignated former subdivision 5 as subdivision 6 and in subdivision 6, inserted ‘composed,‘ ‘with expertise in the matters under consideration by the Commission or both,‘ and the proviso; and redesignated former subdivision 6 as subdivision 7.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 883 rewrote the section.

§ 30-206.
(Expires July 1, 2024) Staffing.

Administrative staff support shall be provided by the Office of the Clerk of the Senate or the Office of Clerk of the House of Delegates as may be appropriate for the house in which the chairman of the Commission serves. The Division of Legislative Services shall provide legal, research, policy analysis and other services as requested by the Commission. All agencies of the Commonwealth shall provide assistance to the Commission, upon request.

History.

2003, c. 885.

Cross references.

For July 1, 2024, sunset of this chapter, see § 30-209.

§ 30-207.
(Expires July 1, 2024) Chairman’s executive summary of activity and work of the Commission.

The chairman of the Commission shall submit to the Governor and the General Assembly an annual executive summary of the interim activity and work of the Commission no later than the first day of each regular session of the General Assembly. The executive summary shall be submitted as provided in the procedures of the Division of Legislative Automated Systems for the processing of legislative documents and reports and shall be posted on the General Assembly’s website.

History.

2003, c. 885.

Cross references.

For July 1, 2024, sunset of this chapter, see § 30-209.

§ 30-208.
Repealed by Acts 2008, c. 883, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Former § 30-208, which established the Consumer Advisory Board, was derived from Acts 2003, c. 885; 2005, c. 758.

§ 30-209.
(Expires July 1, 2024) Sunset.

This chapter shall expire on July 1, 2024.

History.

2003, c. 885; 2008, c. 883; 2010, c. 388; 2012, Sp. Sess. I, c. 1; 2015, c. 628; 2018, c. 633; 2020, c. 627; 2022, c. 177.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 883 substituted ‘July 1, 2010‘ for ‘July 1, 2008.‘

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 388 substituted ‘July 1, 2012‘ for ‘July 1, 2010.‘

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 1, substituted “July 1, 2015” for “July 1, 2012.”

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 628 substituted “July 1, 2018” for “July 1, 2015.”

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 633 substituted “2020” for “2018” at the end.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 627 substituted “2022” for “2020.”

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 177 substituted “2024” for “2022.”